Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8413. WILLOW POINT MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT OF FORT BEND AND WALLER COUNTIES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8413.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Willow Point Municipal Utility District of Fort Bend and Waller Counties.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 519 (S.B. 351), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 8413.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a municipal utility district in Fort Bend and Waller Counties created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 52(b)(3), Article III, or Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 519 (S.B. 351), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 8413.003. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, applicable to municipal utility districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 519 (S.B. 351), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8413.051. ROAD PROJECTS. (a) The district may construct, acquire, improve, maintain, or operate macadamized, graveled, or paved roads or turnpikes, or improvements in aid of those roads or turnpikes, inside the district.

(b) A road project must meet all applicable construction standards, zoning and subdivision requirements, and regulations of:

(1) each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the district is located; and

(2) each county in which the district is located.

(c) The district may not undertake a road project unless each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the district is located consents by resolution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 519 (S.B. 351), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 8413.052. COMPLIANCE WITH MUNICIPAL CONSENT RESOLUTIONS. The district shall comply with all applicable requirements of any resolution, adopted by the governing body of a municipality, that consented to the creation of the district or to the inclusion of land in the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 519 (S.B. 351), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER C. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8413.101. TAX TO REPAY BONDS FOR ROAD PROJECTS. The district may impose a tax to pay the principal of or interest on bonds issued under Section 8413.151.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 519 (S.B. 351), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER D. BONDS

Sec. 8413.151. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS FOR ROAD PROJECTS. (a) The district may issue bonds or other obligations as provided by Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, to finance the construction, maintenance, or operation of projects under Section 8413.051.

(b) The district may not issue bonds or other obligations secured wholly or partly by ad valorem taxation to finance projects authorized by Section 8413.051 unless the issuance is approved by a vote of a two-thirds majority of the voters in the district or of the defined areas to be benefited by the project as provided by Subchapter J, Chapter 54, Water Code, voting at an election called for that purpose.

(c) Bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance projects authorized by Section 8413.051 may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district or the defined area as provided by Subchapter J, Chapter 54, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 519 (S.B. 351), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1128 (H.B. 2590), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2019.